Florida, session 2026, SB1282.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 21 22 Section 1.âPresent paragraphs (g) through (j) of subsection 23 (1), paragraphs (g) and (h) of subsection (13), and subsection 24 (14) of section 849.0931, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 25 paragraphs (h) through (k) of subsection (1), paragraphs (j) and 26 (k) of subsection (13), and subsection (15), respectively, a new 27 paragraph (g) is added to subsection (1) of that section, new 28 paragraphs (g) and (h) and paragraph (i) are added to subsection 29 (13) of that section, a new subsection (14) is added to that 30 section, and paragraphs (a), (d), (e), and (f) of subsection (1) 31 and paragraphs (b) and (f) of subsection (13) of that section 32 are amended, to read: 33 849.0931âBingo authorized; conditions for conduct; 34 permitted uses of proceeds; limitations.â 35 (1)âAs used in this section: 36 (a)ââBingo gameâ means and refers to the activity, commonly 37 known as âbingo,â in which participants pay a sum of money for 38 the use of one or more bingo cards. When the game commences, 39 numbers are drawn by chance, one by one, and announced. The 40 players cover or mark those numbers on the bingo cards which 41 they have purchased until a player receives a given order of 42 numbers in sequence that has been preannounced for that 43 particular game. This player calls out âbingoâ and is declared 44 the winner of a predetermined prize. More than one game may be 45 played upon a bingo card, and numbers called for one game may be 46 used for a succeeding game or games. 47 (d)ââDealâ means a separate set or package of not more than 48 4,000 instant bingo tickets in which the predetermined minimum 49 prize payout is at least 65 percent of the total receipts from 50 the sale of the entire deal. 51 (e)ââFlareâ means the board, or placard, or digital display 52 that accompanies each deal of instant bingo tickets and that 53 displays has printed on or affixed to it the following 54 information: 55 1.âThe game name. 56 2.âThe manufacturerâs name or distinctive logo. 57 3.âThe form number. 58 4.âThe ticket count. 59 5.âThe prize structure, including the number of symbols or 60 number combinations for winning instant bingo tickets by 61 denomination, with their respective winning symbols or number 62 combinations. 63 6.âThe cost per play. 64 7.âThe game serial number. 65 (f)ââInstant bingoâ means a form of bingo that is played at 66 the same location as bingo, using tickets that are sold by the 67 bingo operator or through an instant bingo ticket dispenser by 68 which a player wins a prize by opening and removing a cover from 69 the ticket to reveal a set of numbers, letters, objects, or 70 patterns, some of which have been designated in advance as prize 71 winners. 72 (g)ââInstant bingo ticket dispenserâ means a device that 73 dispenses an instant bingo ticket or reads a barcode printed on 74 the exterior of the instant bingo ticket as the ticket is 75 dispensed and displays the win or loss status of the instant 76 bingo ticket on a video display contained on the device. 77 (13) 78 (b)âEach deal of instant bingo tickets must be accompanied 79 by a flare, and the flare must be visible to the player posted 80 before the sale of any tickets in that deal. 81 (f)âExcept as provided under paragraph (e), an instant 82 bingo ticket manufactured, sold, or distributed in this state 83 must: 84 1.âBe manufactured so that it is not possible to identify 85 whether it is a winning or losing instant bingo ticket until it 86 has been opened by the player as intended or the results are 87 displayed on an instant bingo dispenser that reveals the win or 88 loss status of the ticket as it is dispensed. 89 2.âBe manufactured using at least a two-ply paper stock 90 construction so that the instant bingo ticket is opaque. 91 3.âHave the form number, the dealâs serial number, and the 92 name or logo of the manufacturer conspicuously printed on the 93 face or cover of the instant bingo ticket. 94 4.âHave a form of winner protection that allows the 95 organization to verify, after the instant bingo ticket has been 96 played, that the winning instant bingo ticket presented for 97 payment is an authentic winning instant bingo ticket for the 98 deal in play. The manufacturer shall provide a written 99 description of the winner protection with each deal of instant 100 bingo tickets. 101 (g)âAn instant bingo ticket dispenser must have the 102 following features: 103 1.âA bill acceptor that accepts only United States currency 104 and accounts for all currency inserted into the dispenser. 105 2.âThe ability to track the sale of all instant bingo 106 tickets dispensed. 107 (h)âAn instant bingo ticket dispenser that reads a bar code 108 and displays the ticket outcome on a video display on the device 109 must have the additional capability of: 110 1.âProducing a voucher for prize verification and 111 redemption or proof of purchase; and 112 2.âProducing reports showing gross sales, prizes paid, and 113 net receipts to the charitable, nonprofit, or veteransâ 114 organization. 115 (i)âAn instant bingo ticket dispenser may not: 116 1.âDisplay the outcome of an instant bingo ticket using 117 spinning reels or other features that mimic a slot machine or 118 any common casino table game; 119 2.âContain a random number generator or any software that 120 influences the outcome of the instant bingo game; or 121 3.âContain any feature that simulates skill or allows 122 player input to influence the outcome of the predetermined 123 instant bingo game result. 124 (14)âThis section may not be construed to authorize a 125 charitable, nonprofit, or veteransâ organization to engage in 126 class III gaming as that term is defined in 25 U.S.C. s. 2703 127 (8). 128 Section 2.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 129 made by this act to section 849.0931, Florida Statutes, in a 130 reference thereto, paragraph (e) of subsection (4) of section 131 402.82, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 132 402.82âElectronic benefits transfer program.â 133 (4)âUse or acceptance of an electronic benefits transfer 134 card is prohibited at the following locations or for the 135 following activities: 136 (e)âA commercial bingo facility that operates outside the 137 provisions of s. 849.0931. 138 Section 3.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 139 made by this act to section 849.0931, Florida Statutes, in a 140 reference thereto, section 718.114, Florida Statutes, is 141 reenacted to read: 142 718.114âAssociation powers.âAn association may enter into 143 agreements to acquire leaseholds, memberships, and other 144 possessory or use interests in lands or facilities such as 145 country clubs, golf courses, marinas, and other recreational 146 facilities, regardless of whether the lands or facilities are 147 contiguous to the lands of the condominium, if such lands and 148 facilities are intended to provide enjoyment, recreation, or 149 other use or benefit to the unit owners. All of these 150 leaseholds, memberships, and other possessory or use interests 151 existing or created at the time of recording the declaration 152 must be stated and fully described in the declaration. 153 Subsequent to the recording of the declaration, agreements 154 acquiring these leaseholds, memberships, or other possessory or 155 use interests which are not entered into within 12 months of the 156 date of the recording of the certificate of a surveyor and 157 mapper pursuant to s. 718.104(4)(e) or the recording of an 158 instrument that transfers title to a unit in the condominium 159 which is not accompanied by a recorded assignment of developer 160 rights in favor of the grantee of such unit, whichever occurs 161 first, are a material alteration or substantial addition to the 162 real property that is association property, and the association 163 may not acquire or enter into such agreements except upon a vote 164 of, or written consent by, a majority of the total voting 165 interests or as authorized by the declaration as provided in s. 166 718.113. The declaration may provide that the rental, membership 167 fees, operations, replacements, and other expenses are common 168 expenses and may impose covenants and restrictions concerning 169 their use and may contain other provisions not inconsistent with 170 this chapter. A condominium association may conduct bingo games 171 as provided in s. 849.0931. 172 Section 4.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 173 made by this act to section 849.0931, Florida Statutes, in a 174 reference thereto, subsection (10) of section 723.079, Florida 175 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 176 723.079âPowers and duties of homeownersâ association.â 177 (10)âAny mobile home ownersâ association or group of 178 residents of a mobile home park as defined in this chapter may 179 conduct bingo games as provided in s. 849.0931. 180 Section 5.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 181 made by this act to section 849.0931, Florida Statutes, in a 182 reference thereto, subsection (3) of section 849.09, Florida 183 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 184 849.09âLottery prohibited; exceptions.â 185 (3)âAny person who is convicted of violating any of the 186 provisions of paragraph (e), paragraph (f), paragraph (g), 187 paragraph (i), or paragraph (k) of subsection (1) is guilty of a 188 misdemeanor of the first degree, punishable as provided in s. 189 775.082 or s. 775.083. Any person who, having been convicted of 190 violating any provision thereof, thereafter violates any 191 provision thereof is guilty of a felony of the third degree, 192 punishable as provided in s. 775.082, s. 775.083, or s. 775.084. 193 The provisions of this section do not apply to bingo as provided 194 for in s. 849.0931. 195 Section 6.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 196 made by this act to section 849.0931, Florida Statutes, in a 197 reference thereto, paragraph (a) of subsection (1) of section 198 849.094, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 199 849.094âGame promotion in connection with sale of consumer 200 products or services.â 201 (1)âAs used in this section, the term: 202 (a)ââGame promotionâ means, but is not limited to, a 203 contest, game of chance, sweepstakes, or gift enterprise, 204 conducted by an operator within or throughout the state and 205 other states in connection with and incidental to the sale of 206 consumer products or services, and in which the elements of 207 chance and prize are present. However, âgame promotionâ may not 208 be construed to apply to bingo games conducted pursuant to s. 209 849.0931. 210 Section 7.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 211 made by this act to section 849.0931, Florida Statutes, in a 212 reference thereto, subsection (6) of section 849.142, Florida 213 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 214 849.142âExempted activities.âSections 849.01, 849.08, 215 849.09, 849.11, 849.14, and 849.25 do not apply to participation 216 in or the conduct of any of the following activities: 217 (6)âBingo games conducted pursuant to s. 849.0931. 218 Section 8.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.